apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="mengangkut/__vblex">
    <e c="meN-, meN-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacuh/kan__vblex">
    <e c="meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacung/__vblex">
    <e c="meN-, meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengawas/i__vblex">
    <e c="meN-i, meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalir/__vblex">
    <e c="meN-, meN-kan, meN-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- meN- (Adj -> V) -->
    <pardef n="mengacak/__adj">
    <e c="meN">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengadil/i__adj">
    <e c="meN-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menghormat/__adj">
    <e c="meN-, meN-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengabsah/kan__adj">
    <e c="meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengabadi/__adj">
    <e c="meN-, meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="membaru/i__adj">
    <e c="meN-i, meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengalah/__adj">
    <e c="meN-, meN-kan, meN-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- meN- (N -> V) -->
    <pardef n="mengadopsi/__n">
    <e c="meN">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengair/i__n">
    <e c="meN-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="membatas/__n">
    <e c="meN-, meN-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengakibat/kan__n">
    <e c="meN-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="geledah"><p><l>menggeledah</l><r>geledah</r></p><par n="mengangkut/__vblex" prm="geledah"/></e>
    <e lm="jajah"><p><l>menjajah</l><r>jajah</r></p><par n="mengangkut/__vblex" prm="jajah"/></e>
    <e lm="rempah"><p><l>merempah</l><r>rempah</r></p><par n="mengangkut/__vblex" prm="rempah"/></e>
    <e lm="igau"><p><l>mengigau</l><r>igau</r></p><par n="mengacuh/kan__vblex" prm="igau"/></e>
    <e lm="pejam"><p><l>memejam</l><r>pejam</r></p><par n="mengacuh/kan__vblex" prm="mejam"/></e>
    <e lm="wajib"><p><l>mewajib</l><r>wajib</r></p><par n="mengacuh/kan__vblex" prm="wajib"/></e>
    <e lm="hangus"><p><l>menghangus</l><r>hangus</r></p><par n="mengacung/__vblex" prm="hangus"/></e>
    <e lm="mohon"><p><l>memohon</l><r>mohon</r></p><par n="mengacung/__vblex" prm="mohon"/></e>
    <e lm="sudi"><p><l>menyudi</l><r>sudi</r></p><par n="mengacung/__vblex" prm="nyudi"/></e>
    <e lm="hadir"><p><l>menghadir</l><r>hadir</r></p><par n="mengawas/i__vblex" prm="hadir"/></e>
    <e lm="lalu"><p><l>melalu</l><r>lalu</r></p><par n="mengawas/i__vblex" prm="lalu"/></e>
    <e lm="renang"><p><l>merenang</l><r>renang</r></p><par n="mengawas/i__vblex" prm="renang"/></e>
    <e lm="iring"><p><l>mengiring</l><r>iring</r></p><par n="mengalir/__vblex" prm="iring"/></e>
    <e lm="sambit"><p><l>menyambit</l><r>sambit</r></p><par n="mengalir/__vblex" prm="nyambit"/></e>
    <e lm="tunggang"><p><l>menunggang</l><r>tunggang</r></p><par n="mengalir/__vblex" prm="nunggang"/></e>
    <e lm="dahak"><p><l>mendahak</l><r>dahak</r></p><par n="mengadopsi/__n" prm="dahak"/></e>
    <e lm="intimidasi"><p><l>mengintimidasi</l><r>intimidasi</r></p><par n="mengadopsi/__n" prm="intimidasi"/></e>
    <e lm="sambal"><p><l>menyambal</l><r>sambal</r></p><par n="mengadopsi/__n" prm="nyambal"/></e>
    <e lm="jembatan"><p><l>menjembatan</l><r>jembatan</r></p><par n="mengair/i__n" prm="jembatan"/></e>
    <e lm="madu"><p><l>memadu</l><r>madu</r></p><par n="mengair/i__n" prm="madu"/></e>
    <e lm="ledek"><p><l>meledek</l><r>ledek</r></p><par n="membatas/__n" prm="ledek"/></e>
    <e lm="teladan"><p><l>meneladan</l><r>teladan</r></p><par n="membatas/__n" prm="neladan"/></e>
    <e lm="industri"><p><l>mengindustri</l><r>industri</r></p><par n="mengakibat/kan__n" prm="industri"/></e>
    <e lm="pedas"><p><l>memedas</l><r>pedas</r></p><par n="mengakibat/kan__n" prm="medas"/></e>
    <e lm="comot"><p><l>mencomot</l><r>comot</r></p><par n="mengacak/__adj" prm="comot"/></e>
    <e lm="iri"><p><l>mengiri</l><r>iri</r></p><par n="mengacak/__adj" prm="iri"/></e>
    <e lm="peka"><p><l>memeka</l><r>peka</r></p><par n="mengacak/__adj" prm="meka"/></e>
    <e lm="jahil"><p><l>menjahil</l><r>jahil</r></p><par n="mengadil/i__adj" prm="jahil"/></e>
    <e lm="nakal"><p><l>menakal</l><r>nakal</r></p><par n="mengadil/i__adj" prm="nakal"/></e>
    <e lm="sepakat"><p><l>menyepakat</l><r>sepakat</r></p><par n="mengadil/i__adj" prm="nyepakat"/></e>
    <e lm="ceroboh"><p><l>menceroboh</l><r>ceroboh</r></p><par n="menghormat/__adj" prm="ceroboh"/></e>
    <e lm="lampau"><p><l>melampau</l><r>lampau</r></p><par n="menghormat/__adj" prm="lampau"/></e>
    <e lm="sobek"><p><l>menyobek</l><r>sobek</r></p><par n="menghormat/__adj" prm="nyobek"/></e>
    <e lm="gilap"><p><l>menggilap</l><r>gilap</r></p><par n="mengabsah/kan__adj" prm="gilap"/></e>
    <e lm="lamban"><p><l>melamban</l><r>lamban</r></p><par n="mengabsah/kan__adj" prm="lamban"/></e>
    <e lm="sembrono"><p><l>menyembrono</l><r>sembrono</r></p><par n="mengabsah/kan__adj" prm="nyembrono"/></e>
    <e lm="galak"><p><l>menggalak</l><r>galak</r></p><par n="mengabadi/__adj" prm="galak"/></e>
    <e lm="labuh"><p><l>melabuh</l><r>labuh</r></p><par n="mengabadi/__adj" prm="labuh"/></e>
    <e lm="simbah"><p><l>menyimbah</l><r>simbah</r></p><par n="mengabadi/__adj" prm="nyimbah"/></e>
    <e lm="gemar"><p><l>menggemar</l><r>gemar</r></p><par n="membaru/i__adj" prm="gemar"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>melengkap</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="membaru/i__adj" prm="lengkap"/></e>
    <e lm="susah"><p><l>menyusah</l><r>susah</r></p><par n="membaru/i__adj" prm="nyusah"/></e>
    <e lm="jauh"><p><l>menjauh</l><r>jauh</r></p><par n="mengalah/__adj" prm="jauh"/></e>
    <e lm="panas"><p><l>memanas</l><r>panas</r></p><par n="mengalah/__adj" prm="manas"/></e>
    <e lm="teduh"><p><l>meneduh</l><r>teduh</r></p><par n="mengalah/__adj" prm="neduh"/></e>
